California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The district may issue refunding bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness for the purpose of paying and redeeming at or before maturity any bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued under this chapter, provided that such refunding bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness shall not be in excess of the limitation of indebtedness authorized under this chapter and shall mature in not to exceed seven years from the date of the original indebtedness. Such refunding bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness may in turn be refunded under like terms and conditions, provided that in no event shall such refunding notes mature in excess of seven years from the date of the original indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

13373.

General obligation indebtedness issued pursuant to this chapter shall be payable from any sources of available funds, including revenues or taxes. The board is hereby authorized to levy and collect taxes upon all property in the district subject to taxation by the district without limitation of rate or amount for the payment of the evidences of such general obligation indebtedness and the interest thereon. Such taxes shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for district purposes and shall be levied at the same time and in the same manner as other district taxes are levied and when collected shall be deposited in a special fund and shall be used for no purpose other than the payment of the principal of and interest on such general obligation indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

13374.

This chapter applies only to districts which have owned and operated an electric distribution system or electric generating facilities or a water distribution or sewage disposal system for at least eight years and which contain a population of 250,000 or more.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 430, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13375.

As used in this chapter, the term “revenues of the district” shall have the same meaning as is provided in Section 54315 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

13376.

When bonds are issued under this article, the preliminary resolution of the board adopted pursuant to this article shall take effect upon its adoption by the board subject to the right of referendum provided for in this article. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized under this article from time to time and the authority herein contained shall not be limited to any particular issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

13377.

Whenever a resolution authorizes the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 13371, the board shall cause the resolution to be published in the manner provided for the publication of notices. At any time within 60 days after the date of the second such publication a referendum petition, signed by voters in number equal to at least 3 percent of the total vote cast, as defined in Section 11507, demanding the submission of such resolution to a vote of the voters of the district for their assent to the issuance of the proposed bonds, may be filed with the secretary. Upon presentation to the secretary of a petition meeting the requirements of this section, the resolution which is the subject thereof shall be of no effect unless and until it has been approved by the voters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

13378.

If no such referendum petition is presented within the period of 60 days, then upon the expiration of such period, or if the proposition of issuing the bonds specified in the resolution of the board adopted pursuant to this article has been assented to by a majority of the voters voting on the proposition, whether upon referendum or pursuant to Section 13379, then upon such proposition having been so assented to, the resolution shall take full and final effect, and the board may proceed in accordance with the provisions of this article and issue bonds within the terms of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------

13379.

The board at any time may, and upon the filing of a referendum petition as provided in Section 13377 shall, adopt a resolution calling a special election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the proposition of issuing revenue bonds in conformity with the preliminary resolution adopted pursuant to this article. The resolution calling the election shall fix the date on which the election is to be held, the proposition to be submitted thereat, the manner of holding the election and of voting for or against the proposition, and shall state that in all other particulars the election shall be held and the votes canvassed as provided by law for the holding of elections within the district. Such election may be held separately or may be consolidated with any other election authorized by law at which the voters of the district may vote. The resolution calling the election shall be published and no other notice of the election need be given. The votes of a majority of all the voters voting on the proposition at the election are required to authorize the issuance of bonds pursuant to Section 13371.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1117.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Borrowing to Purchase Electricity [13391. - 13392.]

13391.

A district may borrow money and incur indebtedness for the purchasing of electricity; provided, that the maximum principal amount of indebtedness outstanding under this article shall not at any one time exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13392.

All provisions of this chapter not inconsistent with this article and not by their terms made inapplicable thereto shall apply to all evidences of indebtedness issued under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 365, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Special District for Sewage Disposal or Solid Waste Resource Recovery [13451. - 13691.]



  ARTICLE 1. Proposal of Formation [13451. - 13456.]

13451.

One or more special districts for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes may be created within the boundaries of a district as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13452.

Resolutions shall first be passed by the legislative bodies of half or more, but of not less than two, of the public agencies, all or any part of the area of which it is intended to include in the proposed special district, declaring that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special district for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes and describing its boundaries. The boundaries of the proposed special district may include territory outside any such public agency if the territory is within the area of the municipal utility district. When the entire area of any public agency is to be included in the special district it may be described
 in the resolutions by name. Certified copies of the resolutions shall be filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13453.

Instead of procedure by resolutions, a petition may be filed with the secretary of a district signed by voters within the proposed special district equal in number to at least 10 percent of the total vote cast. The boundaries of the proposed special district shall be described in the petition and shall include at least two public agencies or portions thereof. A statement of the name of any public agency constitutes a sufficient and legal description of the territory thereof if the entire area of the agency is included.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13454.

The petition shall declare that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special district for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes within the area of the district described in the petition. The petition may be on separate papers, but each paper shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13455.

The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures with the affidavits of registration and shall certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13456.

The board may initiate proceedings for the creation of a special district for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes within the area of the district by passing a resolution declaring that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a special district for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes, and describing its boundaries, which shall include all or any part of two or more public agencies. A public agency to be included may be described by name. No certified copy of the resolution need be filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing [13481. - 13488.]

13481.

Within 60 days after receipt of the resolutions of the public agencies or receipt of the certification of the sufficiency of a petition by the secretary of the district, or the passage of the resolution of the board, the board shall, by resolution, designate the special district as “____ (here insert name) Municipal Utility District, Special District No. ____ (here insert number)” (all such special districts shall be numbered consecutively) and shall fix a time and place for a hearing on the proposed creation of the special district for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes and shall publish notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13482.

The notice of hearing shall be published once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13483.

The time fixed for the hearing shall be not less than 30 nor more than 60 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13484.

At or before the hearing, any person interested may file with the secretary of the district written objections to the creation of the special district or to the inclusion of his property therein. Upon the hearing the board shall hear and determine all protests and objections. The hearing may be adjourned from time to time by the board without further notice other than an order to be entered upon the minutes of its meeting fixing the time and place of the adjournment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13485.

The board may reduce or enlarge the boundaries of the proposed special district, but the boundaries as enlarged shall be within the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13486.

The board shall not approve the creation of a special district containing territory in addition to the territory included in the resolutions or petitions filed with the secretary of the district, or in its own resolution, until notice of its intention to include such additional territory has been published for the time and in the manner prescribed for the original hearing on the matter and a hearing is had pursuant to the notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13487.

No public agency or portion thereof shall be included within the boundaries of a special district unless its legislative body consents by resolution, or unless the proceedings for the creation of the special district have been initiated by petition of the voters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13488.

If no protests are filed, or if the protests filed are overruled and denied by the board, the board shall thereupon by resolution approve the creation of the special district either as originally described or as revised by the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Election [13511. - 13513.]

13511.

At any time after the board has approved the creation of the proposed special district, and fixed its boundaries, the board shall call and publish notice of an election within the proposed special district for the purpose of determining whether the proposed special district will be created and, if the board so determines, for the submission of a proposition for incurring a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any works, lands, structures, rights, or any other property necessary or convenient for the recovery of resources from solid waste or for the collection, treatment, or disposition of sewage matter for the special district. If the board determines that no bonded indebtedness is presently necessary, the board may call the election for the creation and establishment of the special district only, and a bond election may later be called.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13512.

No person is entitled to vote at the election unless he is a voter of the territory included in the proposed special district. The election may be held on the same day as any other state, county, or city election and may be consolidated therewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13513.

If a proposition for incurring a bonded indebtedness is submitted at the same election with the proposal to create the special district, the votes cast on the proposition of incurring a bonded indebtedness shall be separately canvassed in the special district as a whole. The favorable vote of two-thirds of all the voters voting on the proposition of issuing bonds within the special district as finally established is required to authorize the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Establishment [13531. - 13532.]

13531.

On the question of the creation of a special district, the returns of each public agency and of each parcel of unincorporated territory shall be canvassed separately, and the board shall order and declare the special district created and established if in each public agency and if in each parcel of unincorporated territory a majority of those who voted on the proposition of creating the special district voted in favor thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13532.

A special district has no separate corporate existence but shall be deemed to be a taxing subdivision of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Powers and Functions [13561. - 13565.]

13561.

Connections of all sewers within the special district to intercepting sewers of the district shall be made at such points and in such manner and under such rules, regulations, terms, charges, and conditions as the board may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13562.

Nothing in this division shall require the district to construct any sewers other than intercepting and outfall sewers. The determination by the board of what are intercepting and outfall sewers within the meaning of this division is final and conclusive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13563.

Upon completion of sewage disposal facilities for any special district all sewage and industrial waste originating within the special district shall be disposed of through the sewage disposal facilities of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13564.

Without limiting in any way the foregoing provisions of this division, the respective public agencies within the district and the district may contract regarding the collection, treatment, or disposition of sewage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13565.

Each utility which a district is authorized to acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use pursuant to this division shall be considered to be a utility owned and operated by the district even though service therefrom is limited to a special district created as provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Waste Water Control [13570. - 13578.]

13570.

The board shall supervise and regulate sewage disposal within a special district, including the fixing of standards, contracts, issuance of licenses or permits, practices and schedules for or in connection with waste water control and sewage disposal functions of such special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

13571.

Without limiting in any way the provisions of this division, and in addition to the powers granted therein, the board may make and enforce such regulations for the control of quantity, quality and flow of waste water within the boundaries of a special district as are not in conflict with the general laws of the state. “Waste water” shall include all sewage, industrial and other wastes and waters, whether treated or untreated, discharged into or permitted to enter a community sewer system connected to or directly into a district interceptor for treatment in sewage disposal facilities of a special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

13572.

Rules and regulations pertaining to the control of quantity, quality or flow of waste water may provide for any or all of the following:

(a) Periodic technical reports to the district from contributors or dischargers into the district’s system.

(b) The issuance of permits or licenses by the district as a condition of discharging waste water for treatment in sewage disposal facilities of a special district.

(c) The installation by the contributor or discharger of pretreatment works or facilities.

(d) The installation by the contributor or discharger of waste water sampling and inspection facilities.

(e) Procedures for enforcement of waste water standards and regulations adopted by the district and remedies for violation thereof.

(f) Entry by the district upon private property to make surveys, inspections or samplings.

(g) Such other provisions as are necessary to effectuate the control of the quantity, quality and flow of waste water within a special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

13573.

No person shall discharge waste water into a community sewer system connected to or directly into a district interceptor which will result in contamination, pollution or a nuisance. All discharges of waste water which are, or could be, harmful to or unreasonably affect the sewage disposal facilities of a district, or which impair or unreasonably affect the operation and maintenance of such facilities, or which violate quantity, quality and flow standards adopted by the district, and all waste water discharges which unreasonably affect, or could unreasonably affect, the quality of the district’s treatment plant effluent in such a manner that receiving water quality requirements established by law cannot be met by the district, shall constitute a nuisance for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

13574.

Whenever a discharge of waste water is in violation of the district’s regulations or otherwise causes or threatens to cause a condition of contamination, pollution or nuisance, as defined in this article, the district may petition the superior court for the issuance of a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, as may be appropriate, restraining the continuance of such discharge. In any civil action brought under this section, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove at any stage of the proceedings that irreparable damage will occur should the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction or permanent injunction not be issued or that the remedy at law is inadequate and the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction or permanent injunction shall issue without such allegations and without such proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

13575.

(a) Any person who fails to comply with any order issued by the district, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day in which the discharge, violation, or refusal occurs.

(b) Any person who intentionally or negligently violates any order issued by the district for violation of rules regulating or prohibiting discharge of waste water which causes or threatens to cause a condition of contamination, pollution or nuisance, as defined in this article, may be liable civilly in a sum not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each day in which the violation occurs.

(c) The attorney of the district, upon request of the board, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess and recover the sums provided for in subdivisions (a) and (b). In determining the amount of the fine the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation, the nature and persistence of the violation, the length of time over which the violation occurs and corrective action, if any, attempted or taken by the discharger.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all civil fines imposed by the court for a violation of this section shall be distributed as follows:

(1) Fifty percent shall be transferred into the general fund of the county in which the action to recover the fine was brought.

(2) Fifty percent shall be transferred once a month to the treasurer of any municipal utility district in the county for deposit in the funds of the district.

(e) Remedies under this section are in addition to and do not supersede or limit any and all other remedies, civil or criminal, but no liability shall be recoverable under this section for any violation for which liability is recovered under Section 13575.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1179, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

13575.5.

(a) The district may issue a complaint to any person on whom civil liability may be imposed pursuant to this article. The complaint shall allege the act or failure to act that constitutes a violation of law, the provision of law authorizing civil liability to be imposed pursuant to this article, and the proposed civil liability.

(b) The complaint shall be served by personal notice or certified mail on the person subject to the district’s discharge and reporting requirements, and shall inform the party served that a hearing shall be conducted within 60 days after the party has been served. The hearing shall be before a hearing officer designated by the board. The person who has been issued a complaint may waive the right to a hearing, in which case the district shall not conduct a hearing. A person dissatisfied with the decision of the hearing officer may appeal to the board of directors within 30 days of notice of the hearing officer’s decision. 

(c) If after the hearing, or appeal, if any, it is found that the person has violated reporting or discharge requirements, the hearing officer or board may assess a fine against that person. In determining the amount of the fine the hearing officer or board shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation, the nature and persistence of the violation, the length of time over which the violation occurs and corrective action, if any, attempted or taken by the discharger. 

(d) Civil liability may be imposed by the district as follows:

(1) In an amount which does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day for knowingly or willfully failing or refusing to furnish technical or monitoring reports.

(2) In an amount which does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day of intentionally or negligently discharging hazardous waste, as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code, knowingly falsifying any information provided in any furnished technical or monitoring report.

(3) In an amount which does not exceed ten dollars ($10) per gallon for discharges in violation of any of the district’s cease and desist or other orders, or prohibitions issued, reissued, or adopted by the district.

(e) All moneys collected under this section shall be deposited in a special district account and shall be made available for the monitoring, treatment, and control of discharges into district facilities.

(f) Unless appealed, orders setting administrative civil liability shall become effective and final upon issuance thereof, and payment shall be made within 30 days. Copies of these orders shall be served by personal service or by registered mail upon the party served with the complaint and upon other persons who appeared at the hearing and requested a copy.

(g) No liability shall be recoverable under this section for any violation for which liability is recovered under Section 13575.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1179, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

13575.6.

Any party aggrieved by a final order issued by the board under Section 13575.5, after granting review of a hearing officer order, may obtain review of the order of the board in the superior court by filing in the court a petition for writ of mandate within 30 days following the issuance of the order by the board. Any party aggrieved by a final order of a hearing officer issued under Section 13575.5 for which the board denies review may obtain review of the order of the hearing officer in the superior court by filing in the court a petition of writ of mandate within 30 days following the denial of review by the board.

If no aggrieved party petitions for writ of mandate within the time provided by this section, an order of the board or a hearing officer shall not be subject to review by any court or agency, except that the board may grant review on its own motion of an order issued under Section 13575.5 after the expiration of the time limits set by that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1179, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13575.7.

(a) Within 30 days after service of a copy of a decision and order issued by the board pursuant to Section 13575.5, any aggrieved party may file with the superior court a petition for writ of mandate for review thereof. Failure to file a petition shall not preclude a party from challenging the reasonableness and validity of a decision or order of a hearing officer or the board in any judicial proceedings brought to enforce that decision or order or for other civil remedies.

(b) The evidence before the court shall consist of the record before the board, including the hearing officer’s record, and any other relevant evidence which, in the judgment of the court, should be considered to effectuate and implement the policies of this division. In every such case, the court shall exercise its independent judgment on the evidence.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, subdivisions (e) and (f) of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern proceedings pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1179, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

13576.

Any person who intentionally discharges waste water in any manner, in violation of any order issued by the district, which results in contamination, pollution or a nuisance, as defined in this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

13576.5.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement or representation in any record, report, plan, or other document filed with the district, or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method required by the district, shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1179, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13577.

Any abatement actions taken pursuant to the foregoing sections with respect to contamination, pollution or nuisance, as defined in this article, created by the discharge of waste water into a community sewer system shall be taken against the agent or agency operating such system and the contributor or contributors whose waste creates the contamination, pollution or nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------

13578.

The district may enter upon private property of any person and sample at, inspect or survey the waste water sampling installation or pretreatment facilities or processes of any contributor or discharger to ascertain whether district regulations for control of quantity, quality and flow of waste water are being complied with. Such inspections shall be made with the consent of the owner or possessor of such facilities or, if such consent is refused, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedure set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. However, in the event of an emergency affecting the public health or safety, such inspection may be made without the consent or the issuance of a warrant. The district may terminate or cause to be terminated sewage disposal or water services to such property if a violation of any rule or regulation pertaining to control of waste water is found to exist or if a discharge of waste water causes or threatens to cause a condition of contamination, pollution or nuisance, as defined in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 733.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Financing [13591. - 13593.]

13591.

The board may use temporarily any district funds for the payment of any costs or expenses incident to the proposed or actual creation of a special district for sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery purposes or the acquisition, construction, or completion of any works, lands, structures, rights, or other property necessary or convenient for the recovery of resources from solid waste or for the collection, treatment, or disposition of sewage matter for the special district or incident to the operation or maintenance of the special district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13592.

The board shall recover all district funds advanced under this article by means of taxes levied upon all property within the special district or from any appropriate funds or revenues of the special district; but nothing in this section shall compel reimbursement if the tax required therefor would amount to less than one mill ($0.001) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value of the property within the special district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13593.

Nothing in this article limits the general powers of a district with reference to sewage disposal or solid waste resource recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Bonds [13621. - 13626.]

13621.

At any time after the creation of a special district a proposition of incurring bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, or completion by the district of any works, lands, structures, rights, or any other property necessary or convenient for the recovery of resources from solid waste or for the collection, treatment, or disposition of sewage matter for the special district may be submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

13622.

Except as otherwise provided herein the provisions of Chapter 7 shall substantially govern as to all matters pertaining to the issuance of bonds under this article, including among other things, and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the calling and holding of the bond election, the form, execution, issuance, maturity, redemption, refunding, validation, the payment of interest from bond funds and the status of the bonds as investments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 808.)
-------------------------------------------

13623.

The favorable vote of two-thirds of all the voters within the special district voting on the proposition is required to authorize the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 761.)
-------------------------------------------

13624.

Only the property in the special district shall be taxable for the payment of the principal and interest on special district bonds. Until the bonds are paid, taxes shall be levied in substantial compliance with Section 12893.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13625.

Any proceeding denying the validity of the creation of any special district, or of any bonds authorized by the voters thereof pursuant to this division, shall be brought within three months after the date upon which the applicable proposition is approved by the voters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13626.

The board may utilize the provisions of Chapter 7.1 (commencing with Section 13345) to authorize emergency financing of the repair or replacement of damaged or demolished works of the special district; provided, that the payment of the principal and interest on such bonds or evidences of indebtedness shall be made only from revenues, taxes, or other available funds, of the special district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 512.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Short-Term Borrowing [13631. - 13633.]

13631.

The special district may borrow money and incur indebtedness in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized to be issued by the voters within the special district but which have not been sold and delivered, and it may issue bonds, notes, or other securities as provided in this article by action of the board and without the necessity of calling and holding an election. Such evidences of indebtedness shall constitute general obligations of the district. The indebtedness may be incurred for any of the purposes for which a bond issue had previously been approved by the voters, and to reimburse the district for expenditures incurred for any of such purposes. The indebtedness incurred under this article shall be evidenced by bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness maturing in not to exceed five years from their date, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be fixed by the board, and may be issued and sold at public sale as the board may direct. All other terms and conditions of such evidences of indebtedness shall be fixed by the board. The maximum principal amount of all indebtedness outstanding under this article shall not at any time exceed the aggregate amount of bonds which the district is then authorized to issue, less the amount of other securities then outstanding issued in anticipation of the sale of such an authorized issue.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

13632.

The special district may issue refunding bonds, notes, or other securities for the purpose of paying and redeeming at or before maturity any bonds, notes or other securities issued under this article, provided that such refunding bonds, notes, or other securities shall not be in excess of the limitation of indebtedness authorized under this article and shall mature in not to exceed five years from their date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------

13633.

Evidences of indebtedness issued pursuant to this article shall be payable from any sources of available funds of the special district, including revenues, taxes, or state or federal grants. If not previously otherwise paid the evidence of indebtedness shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the district in anticipation of which they were issued, and if not so paid, the board is hereby authorized to levy and collect taxes from all property in the special district subject to taxation by the district without limitation of rate or amount for the payment of such evidences of indebtedness. Such taxes shall be in addition to all other taxes levied for special district purposes and shall be levied at the same time and in the same manner as other district taxes are levied and when collected shall be deposited in a special fund and shall be used for no purpose other than the payment of the principal of, and interest on, such indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 310.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Annexation [13651. - 13661.]

13651.

Any public agency or portion thereof or unincorporated territory within the boundaries of a district (hereinafter referred to collectively as “territory”) not included within the boundaries of a special district may be annexed thereto in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13652.

The board shall by resolution determine that the annexation of the territory will facilitate the acquisition or operation of a public utility for the special district, describe therein the territory, declare its intention to annex the territory to the special district, set forth the terms and conditions upon which the territory shall be annexed, fix the time and place for hearing on the question of the annexation, and provide for the giving of notice of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

13653.

No public agency or portion thereof shall be annexed to a special district unless the legislative body thereof shall by resolution consent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

13654.
